Missouri, session 2026, SB1174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 115.295, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 115.295,
to read as follows:
115.295. 1. As each absentee ballot is received by
the election authority, the election authority shall
indicate its receipt on the list.
2. (1) If the statements on any ballot envelope have
not been completed, the voter has failed to sign the oath,
the signature does not appear to be valid, the oath has not
been verified as provided by law, the absentee ballot has
been rejected for any other reason provided by law, or if
the voter is otherwise found disqualified to vote, the
absentee ballot in the envelope shall be rejected and the
election authority shall write across the face of the
envelope "Rejected", giving the reason therefor.
(2) The election authority shall promptly notify the
voter of such rejection, the procedure for curing the
ballot, and the deadline for curing the ballot. A copy of
the notification shall be retained in the files of the
election authority for at least two years.

SB 1174 2
(3) A voter notified that his or her ballot was
rejected shall have until the end of the period for
verifying provisional ballots as provided by law to cure the
ballot.
(4) The voter may cure a failure to complete a
statement on the ballot envelope, to sign the oath, an
invalid signature, or to have the signature verified in the
manner provided by law by submitting an affidavit to the
election authority, along with a copy of one of the forms of
identification required by law, before the deadline. The
affidavit shall affirm that the ballot was submitted by the
voter, is the voter's ballot, and that the voter is
registered and qualified to vote in the election in question.
(5) Provided that the voter is qualified to vote or
has cured any disqualification as provided by law for voters
casting provisional ballots, if the election authority finds
the affidavit and identification to be sufficient, the
absentee ballot shall be counted.
3. All ballot envelopes received by the election
authority shall be kept together in a safe place and shall
not be opened except as provided in this subchapter.
✓